Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB586.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Workplace Misclassification Act.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Construction." As defined in section 2 of the act of October 13, 2010 (P.L.506, No.72), known as the Construction Workplace Misclassification Act."Debar." Action taken by the secretary that:(1) Prohibits a contractor, subcontractor or person from contracting with or participating in contracts for public work or providing services to any State or local government entity for a period of at least three years.(2) Includes all divisions or other organizational elements of the contractor or subcontractor unless limited by the terms of the action to specific divisions or organizational elements.(3) May apply to affiliates or other persons associated with the contractor, subcontractor or person if they are specifically named and given written notice of the action and an opportunity to appeal.20250SB0586PN0593 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (4) Applies to a successor entity of the contractor or subcontractor, if the successor entity:(i) has one or more of the same principals or officers as the employer against whom the order was issued;(ii) performs similar work within the same geographical area;(iii) occupies the same premises;(iv) shares the same telephone number or facsimile number;(v) has the same email address or Internet website;(vi) employs substantially the same workforce or administrative employees, or both;(vii) utilizes the same tools, equipment or facilities;(viii) employs or engages the services of any person or persons involved in the direction or control of the other; or(ix) lists substantially the same work experience."Department." The Department of Labor and Industry of the Commonwealth."Employee." Either of the following:(1) In relation to workers' compensation, the term shall have the meaning given to "employe" in section 104 of the Workers' Compensation Act.(2) In relation to unemployment compensation, the term shall have the meaning given to "employe" in section 4(i) of the Unemployment Compensation Law."Employer." Either of the following:(1) In relation to workers' compensation, the term shall 20250SB0586PN0593 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 have the meaning given to it in section 103 of the Workers' Compensation Act.(2) In relation to unemployment compensation, the term shall have the meaning given to it in section 4(j) of the Unemployment Compensation Law."Public work." As defined in section 2(5) of the act of August 15, 1961 (P.L.987, No.442), known as the Pennsylvania Prevailing Wage Act."Secretary." The Secretary of Labor and Industry of the Commonwealth or the secretary's authorized representative."Unemployment Compensation Law." The act of December 5, 1936 (2nd Sp.Sess., 1937 P.L.2897, No.1), known as the Unemployment Compensation Law."Workers' Compensation Act." The act of June 2, 1915 (P.L.736, No.338), known as the Workers' Compensation Act.Section 3. Independent contractors.(a) Requirements.--For purposes of workers' compensation, unemployment compensation and improper classification of employees, an individual who performs services in any industry other than construction for remuneration is an independent contractor only if:(1) The individual has a written contract that is project-specific and contains a particular scope of work and definitive time period to perform the services.(2) The individual is free from control or direction over performance of services both under the contract of service and in fact.(3) As to services, the individual is customarily engaged in an independently established trade, occupation, profession or business.20250SB0586PN0593 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (b) Criteria.--An individual is customarily engaged in an independently established trade, occupation, profession or business with respect to services the individual performs only if:(1) The individual possesses the essential tools, equipment and other assets necessary to perform the services independent of the person for whom the services are performed.(2) The individual's arrangement with the person for whom the services are performed is such that the individual shall realize a profit or suffer a loss as a result of performing the services.(3) The individual performs the services through a business in which the individual has a proprietary interest.(4) The individual maintains a business location that is separate from the location of the person for whom the services are being performed.(5) The individual:(i) previously performed the same or similar services for another person in accordance with paragraphs (1), (2), (3) and (4) while free from direction or control over performance of the services both under the contract of service and in fact; or(ii) holds themselves out to other persons as available and able and is available and able to perform the same or similar services in accordance with paragraphs (1), (2), (3) and (4) while free from direction or control over performance of the services.(c) Factors not to be considered.--The failure to withhold Federal or State income taxes or pay unemployment compensation 20250SB0586PN0593 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 contributions or workers' compensation premiums with respect to an individual's remuneration shall not be considered in determining whether the individual is an independent contractor for purposes of the Workers' Compensation Act or the Unemployment Compensation Law.(d) Workers' compensation.--(1) An individual who is an independent contractor as determined under this section is not an employee for purposes of the Workers' Compensation Act. For purposes of this section, each employment relationship shall be considered separately.(2) Nothing in this act shall be construed to affect section 321(2) of the Workers' Compensation Act.(e) Unemployment compensation.--(1) For purposes of section 4(l)(2)(B) of the Unemployment Compensation Law, an individual is customarily engaged in an independently established trade, occupation, profession or business only if the criteria in subsection (b) are satisfied.(2) Except as provided in paragraph (1), nothing in this act shall be construed to affect any exclusion from employment as defined in the Unemployment Compensation Law.Section 4. Improper classification of employees.(a) Violation.--An employer or officer or agent of an employer shall be in violation of this act and shall be subject to the penalties, remedies and actions contained in this act if the employer, officer or agent:(1) fails to properly classify an individual as an employee for purposes of the Workers' Compensation Act and fails to provide the coverage required under the Workers' 20250SB0586PN0593 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Compensation Act; or(2) fails to properly classify an individual as an employee for purposes of the Unemployment Compensation Law and fails to pay contributions, reimbursements or other amounts required to be paid under the Unemployment Compensation Law.(b) Separate offenses.--Each individual who is not properly classified as an employee shall be the basis of a separate violation of this section.(c) Order to show cause.--(1) If the secretary receives information indicating that a person has violated this act, the secretary may investigate the matter and issue an order to show cause why the person should not be found in violation of this act.(2) A person served with an order to show cause has 20 days from the date the order is served to file an answer in writing.(3) If the person fails to file a timely and adequate answer to the order to show cause, the secretary may, following notice and hearing:(i) petition a court of competent jurisdiction to issue a stop-work order as provided in section 8; or(ii) immediately assess penalties as provided in section 7.(d) Enforcement.--(1) If, subsequent to issuing an order to show cause under subsection (c), the secretary finds that an employer has failed to properly classify an individual as an employee for the purposes of this act, the secretary shall impose administrative penalties under section 7.20250SB0586PN0593 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) In addition to imposing penalties under paragraph (1), the secretary may refer the matter to the Attorney General for criminal investigation. The secretary shall make a referral if the employer has previously been found in violation of this act in another matter. The Attorney General has jurisdiction under section 5 to initiate an investigation or prosecution of criminal violations of this act regardless of whether a referral has been made.(e) Acting in concert with other parties.--A party that does not meet the definition of "employer" in section 2, but which intentionally contracts or renews a contract with an employer to supply labor to an employer knowing the employer will misclassify the supplied employees in violation of this act, shall be subject to the same penalties, remedies or other actions as the employer found to be in violation of this act.(f) Defense.--It shall be a defense to an alleged violation of this section that the person for whom the services are performed in good faith believed the individual who performed the services qualified as an independent contractor at the time the services were performed.Section 5. Criminal penalties.(a) Grading.--An employer or officer or agent of an employer that intentionally violates section 4(a) commits:(1) A misdemeanor of the first degree, if the employer has no prior offense under section 4(a).(2) A felony of the third degree, if the employer has one or more prior offenses under section 4(a).(b) Summary offense.--(1) An employer or officer or agent of an employer that negligently fails to properly classify an individual as an 20250SB0586PN0593 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 employee under section 4(a) commits a summary offense and shall, upon conviction, be sentenced to pay a fine of not more than $1,000.(2) Evidence of a prior conviction under this subsection shall be admissible as evidence of intent under subsection (a).(c) Concurrent jurisdiction.--(1) The Attorney General has concurrent prosecutorial jurisdiction with the district attorney of the appropriate county for violations under this section and any offense arising out of activity prohibited by this section.(2) No person charged with a violation of this section by the Attorney General has standing to challenge the authority of the Attorney General to prosecute the case, and if a challenge is made, the challenge shall be dismissed and no relief shall be available in the courts of this Commonwealth to the person making the challenge.(d) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Prior offense." A conviction of a violation of section 4 if the judgment of sentence was imposed before the defendant was sentenced for a separate violation of section 4.Section 6. Private right of action.(a) Employees.--An employee who has been misclassified in violation of this act, or has been discharged, been threatened or has otherwise suffered retaliation, discrimination or other adverse action as a result of participating in an investigation or reporting a violation of this act, may bring a private right of action in a court of common pleas in accordance with 20250SB0586PN0593 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 established civil procedures of this Commonwealth.(b) Time.--An action under this section must be brought within three years from the date that the employee knew of the violation, retaliation or discrimination.(c) Relief.--If an employee prevails in an action commenced under this section, the employee shall be entitled to the following relief:(1) Reinstatement of the employee without a loss in seniority status, if applicable.(2) Restitution equal to three times the amount of the employee's wages and fringe benefits calculated from the date of the violation, retaliation or discrimination.(3) Reasonable attorney fees and costs of the action.(4) Other legal and equitable relief the court deems appropriate to make the employee whole.Section 7. Administrative penalties.(a) Power of secretary.--If the secretary finds that a person has violated this act, the secretary:(1) Shall assess and collect civil penalties of not more than $1,000 for the first violation and not more than $2,500 for each subsequent violation.(2) May order a financial audit or tax audit of any relevant prospective records of the person.(b) Factors to be considered.--When determining the amount of the penalty to be imposed, the secretary shall consider factors, including:(1) The history of previous violations by the employer.(2) The seriousness of the violation.(3) The good faith of the employer.(4) The size of the employer's business.20250SB0586PN0593 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (c) Intentional violation.--(1) If the secretary determines that a person has intentionally violated this act, the secretary shall debar, for a period of at least three years, the person from bidding on or participating in a public work project or providing services to any State or local government entity or any private entity that performs work on behalf of a State or local contract.(2) A debarment under paragraph (1) shall apply to the following:(i) Future projects and contracts not begun or entered into on or before the date of the debarment.(ii) Current projects and contracts already entered into but on which the debarred contractor, subcontractor or person has not begun work as of the date of the debarment.Section 8. Stop-work orders.(a) Issuance of order.--(1) If the secretary determines, subsequent to the issuance of an order to show cause under section 4(c), that an employer or officer or agent of an employer has intentionally failed to properly classify an individual as an employee under section 4(a), the secretary may petition a court of competent jurisdiction to issue a stop-work order requiring:(i) the cessation of work by individuals who are improperly classified within 24 hours of the effective date of the order; or(ii) in the event that a majority of individuals working at a site are improperly classified, requiring 20250SB0586PN0593 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the cessation of all business operations of that employer at each site at which a violation occurred within 24 hours of the effective date of the order.(2) The order shall take effect when served upon the employer, or for a particular employer worksite, when served at the worksite. The order shall remain in effect until the court issues an order releasing the stop-work order or upon finding that the employer or officer or agent of the employer is no longer in violation of this act.(3) An order releasing a stop-work order may include a requirement that the employer file with the department periodic reports for a probationary period that may not exceed two years demonstrating the employer's continued compliance with this act.(b) Applicability of orders and penalties.--A stop-work order under subsection (a) and penalty under subsection (c) shall be in effect against any successor corporation or business entity that has one or more of the same principals or officers as the employer against whom the stop-work order was issued or penalty imposed and which is engaged in the same or equivalent trade or activity.(c) Penalty.--The court shall assess a penalty of $1,000 per day against an employer for each day that the employer conducts business operations in violation of a stop-work order issued under this section.Section 9. Procedure.(a) Hearings.--Actions taken under sections 4(c) and 6 shall be subject to the provisions of 2 Pa.C.S. (relating to administrative law and procedure).(b) Subpoenas.--The department may subpoena witnesses, 20250SB0586PN0593 - 12 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 administer oaths, examine witnesses and take testimony or compel the production of documents. The secretary may petition Commonwealth Court to enforce any order or subpoena issued under this act.Section 10. Certain agreements prohibited.(a) Violation.--No person may require or demand that an individual enter into an agreement or sign a document that results in the improper classification of the individual as an independent contractor.(b) Penalty.--A violation of subsection (a) shall be punishable by an administrative fine of not less than $1,000 and not more than $2,500. Each violation shall be considered a separate offense under this section.Section 11. Adverse action prohibited.(a) Retaliation or discrimination.--It shall be unlawful for an employer or officer or agent of an employer to discharge, threaten or otherwise retaliate or discriminate against an employee regarding compensation or other terms or conditions of employment because the employee:(1) participates in an investigation, hearing or inquiry by the secretary or any governmental authority; or(2) reports or makes a complaint regarding the violation of this act to an employer or any governmental authority.(b) Action.--An employee who suffers adverse action in violation of this section may bring a private right of action under section 6.(c) Good faith allegations of noncompliance.--A person who in good faith alleges noncompliance with this act shall be afforded the rights provided by this act, notwithstanding the person's failure to prevail on the merits.20250SB0586PN0593 - 13 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (d) Rebuttable presumptions.--Taking adverse action against a person within 90 days of the person's exercise of a right protected under this act shall raise a rebuttable presumption of having done so in retaliation for the exercise of the right.Section 12. Availability of information.(a) Duty of department.--The department shall develop a poster for job sites that outlines the requirements and penalties under this act and shall make the poster available on the department's publicly accessible Internet website. At the discretion of the secretary, the department may establish and answer a toll-free telephone number to receive alleged violations of this act.(b) Duty of employers.--An employer shall keep a summary of this act and any regulations issued under this act applicable to the employer, posted in a conspicuous place where employees normally pass and can read it, both on job sites and in all places of business.Section 13. Use of penalty funds and recovered fees and costs.Any money collected as a penalty, recovered attorney fee or cost associated with any investigation or enforcement action under this act shall be deposited into a restricted revenue account in the General Fund. Money deposited into the restricted revenue account is appropriated on a continuing basis to the department for the purpose of enforcing this act.Section 14. Rules and regulations.The department may promulgate rules and regulations necessary to implement this act.Section 15. Annual report required.The department shall submit an annual report to the General Assembly by March 1 of the year following the first full year in 20250SB0586PN0593 - 14 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 which this act is in effect, and each year thereafter, detailing, to the maximum extent possible, data on the previous calendar year's administration and enforcement of this act. The department may include any relevant facts and statistics that it believes necessary in the content of the report.Section 16. Severability.The provisions of this act are severable. If any provision of this act or its application to any individual or circumstance is held invalid, the invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of this act which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application.Section 17. Construction of law.Nothing contained in this act shall be construed to impair or affect in any manner the ability of the department and secretary to carry out the powers and duties prescribed by the laws of this Commonwealth.Section 18. Funding.(a) Enforcement.--The department shall not be required to enforce this act until adequate funding is appropriated or transferred into the restricted account identified in section 13.(b) Recovery of fees and costs.--The department, Office of Attorney General or a district attorney's office shall be entitled to recover attorney fees and costs associated with the investigation of employee misclassification, along with any resulting enforcement action, from employers that violate this act.Section 19. Effective date.This act shall take effect in four months.20250SB0586PN0593 - 15 - 1234567891011121314151617181920212223242526272829